District of Columbia statutes.
29-312.01

Dissolution by incorporators or initial directors.

A majority of the incorporators or initial directors of a corporation that has not issued shares or has not commenced business may dissolve the corporation by delivering to the Mayor for filing articles of dissolution that set forth:

(1)

The name of the corporation;

(2)

The date of its incorporation;

(3)

(A)

That none of the corporation’s shares has been issued; or

(B)

That the corporation has not commenced business;

(4)

That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;

(5)

That the net assets of the corporation remaining after winding up have been distributed to the shareholders, if shares were issued; and

(6)

That a majority of the incorporators or initial directors authorized the dissolution.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720